Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.12.130

Trust company as legal representative—Oath by officer.

When any trust company shall be appointed executor, administrator, or trustee of any estate or guardian of the estate of any infant or other incompetent, it shall be lawful for any duly authorized officer of such corporation to take and subscribe for such corporation any and all oaths or affirmations required of such an appointee.

[ 1955 c 33 s 30.12.130. Prior: 1917 c 80 s 50; RRS s 3257. Formerly RCW 30.12.130.]